Massachusetts, session 194th, H3558.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 93E of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:
Section 10. Gasoline station; dealer; electric vehicle charging station required.
1. Definitions. As used in this section:
(a) "gasoline station" shall mean a premises or facility greater than fifteen hundred square
feet with operational gas dispensing motor fuel pumps that dispense motor fuel available for
general public retail sale.
(b) "dealer" shall mean any person owning or operating a premises or facility with one or
more operational gas dispensing motor fuel pumps that dispense motor fuel available for general
public retail sale.
of 2

(c) "electric vehicle charging station" shall mean a level three fast charging station that
delivers electricity from a source outside an electric vehicle. An electric vehicle charging station
may include several charge points simultaneously connecting several electric vehicles to the
station and any related equipment needed to facilitate charging plug-in electric vehicles. Each
electric vehicle charging station shall have non-proprietary chargers capable of charging electric
vehicles from at least three different incorporated auto manufacturers.
2. Any dealer installing new operational gas dispensing motor fuel pumps for the retail
sale of motor fuels for use in motor vehicles shall also assess its proximity to optimal sites along
or near commonwealth highways and major roadways for the hosting of electric vehicle fast
charging hubs and fleet depots, as identified by the electric vehicle coordinating council in its
most recent assessment, as required pursuant to subsection (d) of section 103 of chapter 239 of
the acts of 2024. Any dealer installing new operational gas dispensing motor fuel pumps in said
optimal sites shall also install at least one electric vehicle charging station at such gasoline
station.
3. No building permit shall be issued to a dealer if the documentation submitted for such
building permit does not reflect the completion of a proximity assessment pursuant to subsection
2 and, if said proximity assessment identifies that such gasoline station is located in an optimal
site for the hosting of electric vehicle fast charging hubs and fleet depots, the documentation
submitted for such building permit does not reflect the installation of at least one electric vehicle
charging station at such gasoline station.
of 2